Massachusetts, session 194th, S963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The secretary of the executive office of housing and livable communities, 
under the authority granted in section 16G.5(a) of chapter 6A of Massachusetts General Laws, 
shall promulgate regulations authorizing: 
(a) municipalities with a population of more than 65,000 residents but less than 150,000 
shall be permitted to prioritize no greater than seventy percent of eligible residents who currently 
reside within their geographic boundaries for vacancies in affordable housing units for a period 
of no less than 30 years from the date the tenancy is created, and 
(b) this preference shall apply to all privately assisted housing and any housing subject to 
inclusionary zoning requirements listed on the municipality’s subsidized housing inventory. 
SECTION 2. The secretary shall ensure said regulations pursuant to this Act shall take 
effect within sixty days of its passage.